Louisiana, session 2026, HB1165.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:621.12 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§621.12. Twelfth judicial district
The twelfth judicial district court shall have two three judges.
Section 2. There is hereby created one additional office of district judge for the
Twelfth Judicial District for the parish of Avoyelles.
For the purposes of nominations and election only, there is hereby created in the
Twelfth Judicial District one new division to be designated as Division C.
The additional judge provided shall be elected at large from the Twelfth Judicial
District, shall have jurisdiction throughout the district, and shall be elected by the qualified
electors of the district.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2631 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1165
The additional judge shall have the same qualifications and shall receive the same
emoluments of office, compensation, and expense allowances payable from the same sources
and in the same manner as are now or may hereafter be provided for the other judges of the
district.
The first judge elected to the additional judgeship shall be elected as provided by
Article V, Section 22 of the Constitution of Louisiana. He shall take office on January 1,
2027, and shall serve for a term that shall expire at the same time as provided by law for the
other judges of the court. Thereafter, the successors to the additional judgeship provided by
this Section shall be elected at the same time, in the same manner, and shall serve the same
term as is now or may be hereafter provided for other judges of the district.
Section 3. R.S. 13:1952(7) and Part VII of Chapter 7 of Title 13 of the Louisiana
Revised Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 13:2488.51 through 2488.59, are hereby
repealed in their entirety.
Section 4. The provisions of Section 3 of this Act shall become effective on January
1, 2027.
Section 5. The provisions of Section 1 of this Act shall become effective upon
signature by the governor or, if not signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for
bills to become law without signature by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section
18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved
by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on the day following such approval.